District of Columbia statutes.
47-2885.22

Severability.

If any provision of this part is for any reason held invalid by any court of competent jurisdiction, the provision shall be deemed a separate, distinct, and independent provision, and its invalidity shall not affect the validity of the remaining provisions.

Sept. 16, 1980, D.C. Law 3-98, § 23, 27 DCR 3528
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 302, 59 DCR 6190
1981 Ed., § 2-2022.
D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this subchapter into law.